Iowa, session 2025-2026, 5552XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 5552XD (7) 91
da/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
DIVISION I
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP —— PROMOTION ——
RENEWABLE FUEL INFRASTRUCTURE
Section 1. Section 159A.16, subsection 3, paragraphs a, b,
and c, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows:
a. For each fiscal year, not more than one million
seven hundred fifty thousand dollars shall be allocated to
support the renewable fuel infrastructure program for retail
motor fuel sites as provided in section 159A.14 to finance
the installation, replacement, or conversion of biodiesel
infrastructure as provided in that section.
b. a. For each fiscal year, not more than one hundred
fifty thousand dollars shall be allocated to the department to
support the administration of the programs.
c. b. For each fiscal year, the department may use up to
three-quarters of one percent of the program funds to market
the programs. Otherwise the moneys shall not be transferred,
used, obligated, appropriated, or otherwise encumbered except
to allocate as financial incentives under the programs.
DIVISION II
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP —— PROMOTION
PART A
GENERAL
Sec. 2. Section 23A.2, subsection 8, Code 2026, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. p. An activity carried out by the department
of agriculture and land stewardship to promote the marketing
of Iowa commodities and products, including as provided in
chapters 159 and 187.
Sec. 3. Section 187.201, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department and
shall be used exclusively to administer the programs created
in this subchapter chapter as determined and directed by the
department, and shall not require further special authorization
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-1- da/js 1/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
by the general assembly.
PART B
CHOOSE IOWA PROMOTION PROGRAMS
Sec. 4. Section 187.301, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 1A. The department shall enroll a person as
a choose Iowa member who is any of the following:
a. Actively participating in the program by producing,
processing, or marketing Iowa agricultural products originating
as commodities produced on Iowa farms.
b. Otherwise supporting the program as required by the
department.
Sec. 5. Section 187.301, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. c. The department may adopt rules providing
for choose Iowa membership criteria.
Sec. 6. Section 187.303, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are
amended to read as follows:
1. A person may apply to the department to participate
enroll as a member in the choose Iowa promotional program
according to procedures established by rules adopted by the
department. The department shall evaluate and approve or
disapprove applications an application based on criteria
established by rules adopted by the department. The department
may disapprove an application if the department determines the
applicant’s use of the choose Iowa logo would be associated
with the consumption of an adulterated or illegal food item.
2. The department may enter into a licensing agreement with
a person participating enrolled as a member in the program.
The participating person A member may use the choose Iowa logo
to advertise a food item product originating as an agricultural
commodity produced on an Iowa farm, subject to terms and
conditions required by rules adopted by the department. A
licensing agreement shall not be for more than one year.
Sec. 7. NEW SECTION. 187.307 Choose Iowa school purchasing
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-2- da/js 2/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
program.
1. There is created within the department a choose Iowa
school purchasing program.
2. The department shall administer the program according to
all of the following:
a. A farm or business shall be eligible to participate in
the program if the farm or business is enrolled as a member of
the choose Iowa promotional program as provided in this part 1
of subchapter III.
b. A school or school district is eligible to participate in
the program, if recognized by the department.
c. A qualified food product is limited to meat and poultry,
dairy products other than milk, grains, flour, eggs, honey, and
produce.
3. a. An eligible school or school district purchasing
a qualified food product from an eligible farm or business
shall be reimbursed on a matching basis with the department
contributing one dollar for every one dollar expended by the
eligible school or school district.
b. The department may establish by rule the method and
limitations for determining the amount of funding available to
each school or school district under this section.
c. Notwithstanding paragraph “b”, if the department
determines that there are not sufficient moneys to satisfy
all claims that may be submitted by schools and school
districts, the department shall provide for the distribution
of the available moneys in a manner determined equitable by
the department, which may include a prorated distribution to
participating schools and school districts.
4. The department may administer the program in cooperation
with the department of education and the participating school
or school district in which a participating school is located.
5. The department may use not more than five percent of the
moneys appropriated to support the program in a fiscal year to
pay for the costs of administering the program.
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-3- da/js 3/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
6. The department shall prepare and submit a report
regarding its findings and recommendations to the governor and
general assembly not later than July 31 of each year.
Sec. 8. Section 187.331, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
187.331 Choose Iowa food bank purchasing program.
1. There is created within the department a choose Iowa food
bank purchasing program.
2. The department shall administer the program according to
all of the following requirements:
a. A farm or business that owns or operates the farm source
shall be given a preference to participate in the program if
the farm or business is currently participating eligible to
participate in the program if the farm or business is enrolled
as a member in the choose Iowa promotional program as provided
in this part 1 of subchapter III. Otherwise, a farm or
business may participate in the program if the farm or business
has applied to participate in the choose Iowa promotional
program and the department determines that the application will
be approved.
b. An eligible participant is limited to any Iowa food bank
or an Iowa emergency feeding organization, recognized by the
department.
c. A qualified food product is limited to meat and poultry,
dairy products, grains, flour, eggs, honey, and produce.
3. a. Of the moneys appropriated to support the program in
a fiscal year, not more than two hundred thousand dollars shall
be used to reimburse Iowa food banks and Iowa emergency feeding
organizations.
b. 3. a. An eligible participant Iowa food bank or an
emergency feeding organization purchasing a qualified food
product from an eligible farm or business shall be reimbursed
on a matching basis with the department contributing one dollar
for every one dollar expended by the eligible participant Iowa
food bank or emergency feeding organization.
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-4- da/js 4/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
c. b. An Iowa food bank or Iowa emergency feeding
organization shall not receive more than fifty thousand dollars
per fiscal year for participating in the program.
4. c. The department may use not more than five percent of
the moneys appropriated to support the program in a fiscal year
to pay for the costs of administering the program.
5. 4. The department shall prepare and submit a report
regarding its findings and recommendations to the governor and
general assembly not later than January 15 July 31 of each
year.
6. This section is repealed July 1, 2030.
Sec. 9. Section 190A.2, subsection 7, Code 2026, is amended
by striking the subsection.
Sec. 10. Section 190A.5, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to support
the farm-to-school program in a manner determined by the
department, including for reasonable administrative costs
incurred by the department. However, the department shall
not expend more than four percent of moneys existing at any
one time in the fund during each fiscal year for purpose of
paying costs associated with the administration of the program
and fund incurred by the department during that fiscal year.
Moneys expended from the fund shall not require further special
authorization by the general assembly.
Sec. 11. REPEAL. Section 190A.6, Code 2026, is repealed.
Sec. 12. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE.
1. The Code editor is directed to make the following
transfers:
a. Section 187.331 to section 187.308.
b. Section 159.25 to section 187.309.
2. The Code editor shall correct internal references in the
Code and in any enacted legislation as necessary due to the
enactment of this section.
PART C
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-5- da/js 5/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
INNOVATION AND REVITALIZATION PROGRAMS
Sec. 13. Section 187.311, Code 2026, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 5A. The department may give priority to an
applicant who is a beginning farmer.
Sec. 14. NEW SECTION. 187.315 Butchery innovation and
revitalization program.
1. A butchery innovation and revitalization program is
created within the department. The purpose of the program is
to promote the development, modernization, and expansion of
this state’s butchery industry.
2. In administering the program, the department shall award
financial assistance to eligible businesses to support projects
that do one or more of the following:
a. To expand or refurbish an existing, or to establish a
new, state-inspected small-scale meat processing business.
b. To expand or refurbish an existing, or to establish a
new, federally inspected small-scale meat processing business.
c. To expand or refurbish an existing, or to establish a
new, licensed custom locker.
d. To expand or refurbish an existing, or to establish a
new, mobile slaughter unit that operates in compliance with
the most current mobile slaughter unit compliance guide issued
by the United States department of agriculture food safety and
inspection service.
e. To rent buildings, refrigeration facilities, freezer
facilities, or equipment necessary to expand processing
capacity, including mobile slaughter or refrigeration units
used exclusively for meat or poultry processing.
3. The department shall establish eligibility criteria for
the program. The eligibility criteria must include all of the
following:
a. The business must be located in this state.
b. The business must not have been subject to any regulatory
enforcement action related to federal, state, or local
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-6- da/js 6/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
environmental, worker safety, food processing, or food safety
laws, rules, or regulations within the last five years.
c. The business must only employ individuals legally
authorized to work in this state.
d. The business must not currently be in bankruptcy.
e. The business must employ less than two hundred full-time
nonseasonal individuals.
4. An eligible business seeking financial assistance under
this section shall make application to the department in the
manner and on forms prescribed by the department.
5. Applications for financial assistance under this section
shall be accepted during one or more annual application periods
established by the department. Upon reviewing and scoring all
applications that are received during an application period,
and subject to the availability of moneys, the department may
award financial assistance to eligible businesses. A financial
assistance award shall not exceed the amount of eligible
project costs included in the eligible business’s application.
Priority shall be given to eligible businesses whose proposed
project or projects under subsection 2 are most likely to do
one or more of the following:
a. Create new jobs.
b. Create or expand opportunities for local small-scale
farmers to market processed meat under private labels.
c. Provide greater flexibility or convenience for local
small-scale farmers to have animals processed.
6. An eligible business that is awarded financial
assistance under this section may apply for financial
assistance under other programs administered by the department.
Sec. 15. REPEAL. Section 15E.370, Code 2026, is repealed.
DIVISION III
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP REGULATION ——
ANIMAL HEALTH
Sec. 16. Section 163.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-7- da/js 7/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
NEW SUBSECTION. 7A. Lease facilities in order to carry out
and administer the provisions of this chapter related to an
infectious or contagious disease or a foreign animal disease
preparedness and response effort.
Sec. 17. NEW SECTION. 163.2B Confidentiality.
1. Notwithstanding section 22.7, all information and
records relating to an infectious or contagious disease
received or collected by the department pursuant to this
chapter, including rules adopted under this chapter by the
department, is confidential to the extent it identifies any of
the following:
a. The name, address, and contact information of any person
owning or caring for an animal suspected of or being affected
with any infectious or contagious disease.
b. Any location where an animal suspected of or being
affected with any infectious or contagious disease has been
kept.
c. Information that when considered together leads to the
identity of a person described in paragraph “a” or a location or
premises described in paragraph “b”.
2. Notwithstanding subsection 1, the department, in
acting as the lawful custodian of the confidential record, may
disclose the record or any part of the record if it is deemed
necessary by the state veterinarian to protect the public
health or the health or well-being of animals within the state.
DIVISION IV
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP —— REGULATION
—— WEIGHTS AND MEASURES
Sec. 18. Section 210.1, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
210.1 Standard established Weights and measures standards ——
compliance with federal law.
The weights and measures which have been presented by the
department to the United States national institute of standards
and technology and approved, standardized, and certified by
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-8- da/js 8/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the institute in accordance with the laws of the Congress of
the United States shall be the standard weights and measures
throughout the state regulated under this chapter shall conform
with Iowa’s state primary standard of weights and measures as
described in section 215.1B.
Sec. 19. Section 213.1, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
213.1 State metrologist.
The department secretary of agriculture may designate
one of its assistants the bureau chief of the department’s
weights and measures bureau to act as state metrologist
of weights and measures. All weights and measures sealed
by the state metrologist shall be impressed with the word
“Iowa.” The bureau chief is the appropriate state official
responsible for cooperating with the national institute of
standards and technology as defined in section 215.1 and in the
administration of weights and measures as regulated in this
subtitle.
Sec. 20. Section 213.2, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
213.2 Physical United States standards —— conformity.
Weights and measures, which conform to the standards of the
United States national institute of standards and technology
existing as of January 1, 1979, that are metrologically
traceable to the United States standards supplied by the
federal government or approved as being in compliance with
its standards recognized by the national bureau institute of
standards and technology shall be the Iowa’s state primary
standard of weights and measures as verified by the department.
Such The traceable standards of weights and measures shall
be verified upon their initial receipt of same by the
department and as often as deemed necessary by the secretary
of agriculture department. The secretary department may
provide for the alteration in revise the state primary standard
of weights and measures in order to maintain metrological
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-9- da/js 9/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
traceability with the standard standards of the United States
national institute of standards and technology. All such
alterations The verification or revision shall be made pursuant
to rules promulgated adopted by the secretary department in
accordance with chapter 17A.
Sec. 21. Section 214.3, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
1. A license fee is imposed on a person who uses or
displays for use a commercial weighing and measuring device.
The license fee is due the day the department issues the
license. The amount of the license fee shall be calculated in
accordance with the class or section for devices as established
by handbook 44 of the United States national institute of
standards and technology.
Sec. 22. Section 215.1, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
1. a. “Commercial weighing and measuring device” or “device”
means a weight or measure or weighing or measuring device
used to establish size, quantity, area or other quantitative
measurement of a commodity sold by weight or measurement, or
where when the price to be paid for producing the commodity is
based upon the weight or measurement of the commodity. The
term
b. “Commercial weighing and measuring device” includes an any
of the following:
(1) An accessory attached to or used in connection with
a commercial weighing or measuring device when the accessory
is so designed or installed that its operation may affect the
accuracy of the device. “Commercial weighing and measuring
device” includes a
(2) A public scale or a commercial scanner.
Sec. 23. Section 215.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 3A. “National institute of standards and
technology” means the national institute of standards and
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-10- da/js 10/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
technology established within the United States department of
commerce pursuant to 15 U.S.C. §272.
Sec. 24. Section 215.1A, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
215.1A Inspections.
1. The Except as otherwise expressly provided by statute,
the department shall regularly of agriculture and land
stewardship may inspect all any commercial weighing and
measuring devices, and when device. If the department
receives a complaint is made to the department that any false
or incorrect alleging weights or measures are being made
inaccurately recorded by a device, the department shall inspect
the commercial weighing and measuring devices which caused the
complaint device.
2. The department may inspect a prepackaged goods good to
determine the accuracy of their its recorded weights weight.
3. a. The department may order the owner of the device
or a service agency that installed, serviced, or repaired the
device, to deliver to the department one or more of the service
agency’s most recent test reports documenting the device’s
accuracy.
b. (1) Except as provided in subparagraph (2), the delivery
of a report may be in lieu of an inspection.
(2) The department shall provide for an inspection of any
of the following:
(a) A motor fuel pump as required in section 214.11.
(b) A moisture-measuring device as required in section
215A.2.
(c) A charging station dispensing electric fuel as required
in section 452A.41.
Sec. 25. Section 215.14, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
3. Before approval by the department, the specifications
for a commercial weighing and measuring device shall be
furnished to the purchaser of the device by the manufacturer.
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-11- da/js 11/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
The approval shall be based upon the recommendation of the
United States national institute of standards and technology.
Sec. 26. Section 215.19, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
215.19 Automatic recorders on scales.
Except for scales a scale used by packers a packer
slaughtering fewer than one hundred twenty head of livestock
per day, all scales a scale with a capacity over five hundred
pounds, which are used for commercial purposes, in this
state, and installed after January 1, 1981, shall be equipped
with a type-registering weigh beam, a dial with a mechanical
ticket printer, an automatic weight recorder, or some similar
commercial weighing and measuring device, which shall be used
for printing or stamping the weight values on scale tickets.
A scale or similar device equipped with a malfunctioning
automatic weight recorder may shall not be used for not more
than seven days if the scale or similar device is unable to
print or stamp the ticket so long as and only if a repair to the
automatic recorder is immediately initiated and the user dates,
signs, and accurately handwrites the required information on
the ticket until the scale or similar device is operational.
Sec. 27. Section 215.23, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
2. In determining a servicer’s qualifications, the
department may consider the specifications of the United States
national institute of standards and technology, handbook 44,
“Specifications, Tolerances, and Technical Requirements for
Weighing and Measuring Devices”, or the current successor or
equivalent specifications adopted by the United States national
institute of standards and technology.
Sec. 28. Section 452A.40, Code 2026, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 5A. “National institute of standards and
technology” means the same as defined in section 215.1.
Sec. 29. REPEAL. Sections 213.3 and 213.7, Code 2026, are
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-12- da/js 12/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
repealed.
Sec. 30. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE.
1. The Code editor is directed to make the following
transfers:
a. Section 213.1 to section 215.1B.
b. Section 213.2 to section 215.1C.
c. Section 215.18 to section 215.1D.
d. Section 215.1A to section 215.1E.
2. The Code editor shall correct internal references in the
Code and in any enacted legislation as necessary due to the
enactment of this section.
DIVISION V
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP REGULATION ——
GRAIN MARKETING
PART A
GRAIN DEALERS
Sec. 31. Section 203.3, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
b. (1) The grain dealer shall submit to the department,
as required by the department, a financial statement that is
accompanied by an unqualified opinion based upon an audit
performed by a certified public accountant licensed in this
state.
(2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), if a grain dealer
does not purchase grain by credit-sale contract, the department
may accept any of the following:
(a) A qualification in an opinion based on an audit that
is unavoidable by any audit procedure that is permitted under
generally accepted accounting principles. An opinion that
is qualified because of a limited audit procedure or because
the scope of an audit is limited shall not be accepted by the
department.
(b) A financial statement that is accompanied by the
report of a certified public accountant licensed in this
state. The report must be based upon a review performed by the
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-13- da/js 13/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
certified public accountant. The report shall be in lieu of an
unqualified opinion based on an audit. However, at any time,
upon good cause, the department may require the grain dealer to
submit to the department a subsequent financial statement that
is accompanied by the report.
(3) The department shall not require that a grain dealer to
submit to the department more than one such unqualified opinion
based on an audit per year.
(4) A grain dealer shall submit one or more financial
statements to the department in addition to the financial
statement accompanied by an unqualified opinion based on
an audit as required in this paragraph if the department
determines that it is necessary to verify the grain dealer’s
financial status or compliance with this section.
Sec. 32. Section 203.3, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
b. (1) The grain dealer shall submit to the department,
as required by the department, a financial statement that is
accompanied by an unqualified opinion based upon an audit
performed by a certified public accountant licensed in this
state.
(2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), the department may
accept any of the following:
(a) A qualification in an opinion based on an audit that
is unavoidable by any audit procedure that is permitted under
generally accepted accounting principles. An opinion that
is qualified because of a limited audit procedure or because
the scope of an audit is limited shall not be accepted by the
department.
(b) A financial statement that is accompanied by the
report of a certified public accountant licensed in this
state. The report must be based upon a review performed by the
certified public accountant. The report shall be in lieu of an
unqualified opinion based on an audit. However, at any time,
upon good cause, the department may require the grain dealer to
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-14- da/js 14/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
submit to the department a subsequent financial statement that
is accompanied by the report.
(3) The department shall not require that a grain dealer to
submit to the department more than one such unqualified opinion
based on an audit per year.
(4) A grain dealer shall submit one or more financial
statements to the department in addition to the financial
statement accompanied by an unqualified opinion based on an
audit required in this paragraph if the department determines
that it is necessary to verify the grain dealer’s financial
status or compliance with this section.
Sec. 33. Section 203.8, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
a. (1) “Delivery” Subject to subparagraph (2), “delivery”
means the transfer of title to and possession of grain by a
seller to a grain dealer or to another person in accordance
with the terms of an agreement of by the seller and the grain
dealer.
(2) Unless title to grain was previously transferred
pursuant to an ordinary cash sale contract, title to grain sold
by credit-sale contract is deemed to have transferred to the
grain dealer, or to another person in accordance with the terms
of the credit-sale contract, when all of the following occurs:
(a) The credit-sale contract is signed by both the grain
dealer and the seller.
(b) The grain dealer or the other person has possession
of the grain in accordance with the terms of the credit-sale
contract.
PART B
GRAIN OPERATORS
Sec. 34. Section 203C.6, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
b. (1) The warehouse operator shall submit to the
department, as required by the department, a financial
statement that is accompanied by an unqualified opinion based
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-15- da/js 15/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
upon an audit performed by a certified public accountant
licensed in this state.
(2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), the department may
accept any of the following:
(a) A qualification in an opinion based on an audit that
is unavoidable by any audit procedure that is permitted under
generally accepted accounting principles. An opinion that
is qualified because of a limited audit procedure or because
the scope of an audit is limited shall not be accepted by the
department.
(b) A financial statement that is accompanied by the
report of a certified public accountant licensed in this
state. The report must be based upon a review performed by
the certified public accountant. The report shall be in lieu
of an unqualified opinion based on an audit. However, at any
time, upon good cause, the department may require the warehouse
operator to submit to the department a subsequent financial
statement that is accompanied by the report.
(3) The department shall not require that a warehouse
operator to submit to the department more than one such
unqualified opinion based on an audit per year.
(4) A warehouse operator shall submit one or more financial
statements to the department in addition to the financial
statement accompanied by an unqualified opinion based on
an audit as required in this paragraph if the department
determines that it is necessary to verify the warehouse
operator’s financial status or compliance with this section.
Sec. 35. Section 203C.6, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
b. (1) The warehouse operator shall submit to the
department, as required by the department, a financial
statement that is accompanied by an unqualified opinion based
upon an audit performed by a certified public accountant
licensed in this state.
(2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), the department may
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-16- da/js 16/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
accept any of the following:
(a) A qualification in an opinion based on an audit that
is unavoidable by any audit procedure that is permitted under
generally accepted accounting principles. An opinion that
is qualified because of a limited audit procedure or because
the scope of an audit is limited shall not be accepted by the
department.
(b) A financial statement that is accompanied by the
report of a certified public accountant licensed in this
state. The report must be based upon a review performed by
the certified public accountant. The report shall be in lieu
of an unqualified opinion based on an audit. However, at any
time, upon good cause, the department may require the warehouse
operator to submit to the department a subsequent financial
statement that is accompanied by the report.
(3) The department shall not require that a warehouse
operator to submit more than one such unqualified opinion based
on an audit per year.
(4) A warehouse operator shall submit one or more financial
statements to the department in addition to the financial
statement accompanied by an unqualified opinion based on
an audit as required in this paragraph if the department
determines that it is necessary to verify the warehouse
operator’s financial status or compliance with this section.
PART C
GRAIN DEPOSITORS AND SELLERS INDEMNIFICATION
Sec. 36. Section 203D.3A, subsection 2, Code 2026, is
amended by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. e. (1) If the per-bushel fee is passed
on to a seller, the per-bushel fee shall occur at the time of
payment.
(2) As used in subparagraph (1), “payment” means the same as
defined in section 203.8.
Sec. 37. Section 203D.6, subsection 8, paragraph a, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-17- da/js 17/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
a. Upon a determination by the board that an eligible
claim satisfies the requirements in subsection 4, the board
shall indemnify the claimant as a depositor under subsection
5, and a seller under subsection 6. Upon a determination by
the board that an eligible repayment claim was filed by that
seller under section 203D.6A, derives from the same covered
transaction during the claim period, and the repayment loss
incurred for that claim, the board shall indemnify the claimant
as a seller subject to the requirements of this section and
section 203D.6A.
Sec. 38. Section 203D.6A, subsection 2, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
2. To be timely, a seller must file a repayment claim with
the department not later than sixty days after the amount
of the seller’s loss is finalized by a bankruptcy court,
whether by an order issued, judgment entered, or settlement
agreement approved. However, if a seller’s loss is based upon
a bankruptcy court’s default judgment, to be timely, the seller
must file a repayment claim with the department not later than
sixty days after the bankruptcy court’s default judgment is
entered or a subsequent settlement agreement is approved and
entered, whichever is later.
DIVISION VI
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION REGULATION —— MOTOR VEHICLES
PART A
MILK HAULERS
Sec. 39. Section 321E.29B, subsection 1, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
1. Notwithstanding section 321E.8, the department
permit-issuing authority may issue annual permits for the
operation of vehicles or combinations of vehicles transporting
fluid milk products to or from a milk plant, receiving
station, or transfer station, exceeding the weight limitation
of section 321.463 but not exceeding a gross weight of
ninety-six one hundred thirty-six thousand pounds, on primary
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-18- da/js 18/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
roads and primary road extensions in cities. The department
shall establish rules regarding minimum distances for axle
configurations.
Sec. 40. EFFECTIVE DATE. This part of this division of this
Act takes effect January 1, 2027.
PART B
IMPLEMENTS OF HUSBANDRY
Sec. 41. Section 321.457, subsection 2, paragraph f, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
f. (1) A trailer or semitrailer, laden or unladen, shall
not have an overall length in excess of fifty-three feet
when operating in a truck tractor-semitrailer combination
exclusive of retractable extensions used to support the load.
However, when a trailer or semitrailer is used exclusively
for the transportation of passenger vehicles, light delivery
trucks, panel delivery trucks, pickup trucks, recreational
vehicle chassis, or boats, the load carried on the trailer or
semitrailer may extend up to three feet beyond the front bumper
and up to four feet beyond the rear bumper of the trailer or
semitrailer.
(2) A lowboy semitrailer, laden or unladen, which that is
designed and exclusively used for the transportation of either
construction equipment or an implement of husbandry shall not
have an overall length in excess of fifty-seven feet when used
in a truck tractor-semitrailer combination.
DIVISION VII
AGRICULTURAL TOURISM
Sec. 42. Section 673A.3, subsection 6, paragraph b, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
b. “Farm” includes but is not limited to a farm field,
orchard, tree farm, nursery, greenhouse, garden, elevator,
seedhouse, barn, warehouse, animal feeding operation structure,
winery, brewery, distillery, or any personal property located
on the land including machinery or equipment used in the
production of a farm commodity.
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-19- da/js 19/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 43. Section 673A.3, subsection 9, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
9. “Farm crop” means a plant or fungus used for food, animal
feed, fiber, or oil, energy, or decoration, including any of
the following:
a. A forage or cereal plant, including but not limited to
alfalfa, barley, buckwheat, corn, flax, forage, millet, oats,
popcorn, rye, sorghum, soybeans, sunflowers, wheat, and grasses
used for forage or silage.
b. Edible or ornamental produce, including but not limited
to fruit such as apples, cherries, peaches, pears, berries, and
grapes; vegetables such as asparagus, broccoli, and carrots;
lentils; tubers; squashes and pumpkins; gourds; maple syrup;
mushrooms; Christmas trees; and flowers.
c. Lumber, logs, pulpwood, and cordwood.
DIVISION VIII
LAND USE
Sec. 44. Section 335.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 4. As used in subsection 1, an agricultural
purpose includes but is not limited to an agricultural tourism
activity or event, value-added agricultural processing,
direct-to-consumer marketing, or other farm-based enterprise
that supports the economic viability of a farm.
Sec. 45. Section 335.28, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
335.28 Agricultural experiences experience.
1. a. For purposes of this section, “agricultural
experience” includes but is not limited to any
agriculture-related activity, or agriculture-related
event, as a that constitutes a secondary use in conjunction
with agricultural production, on a farm which if the
agriculture-related activity, or agriculture-related event,
is located on a farm and open to the public with for the
intended purpose of promoting or educating the public about
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-20- da/js 20/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
agriculture, agricultural practices, agricultural activities,
or agricultural products.
b. “Agricultural experience” also includes agricultural
tourism activities and events, such as recreational,
entertainment, dining, celebratory, and overnight lodging
opportunities offered on a working farm, so long as the farm’s
primary use remains agricultural production.
2. To assist in the promotion of agricultural experiences,
a county shall not require a conditional use permit, special
use permit, special exception, or variance for an agricultural
experiences experience on property of which the primary use is
agricultural production.
Sec. 46. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being
deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment.
Sec. 47. APPLICABILITY. Any conditional use permit,
special use permit, special exception, or variance described
in section 335.28, as amended by this division of this Act, is
void and unenforceable.
DIVISION IX
PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION —— QUALIFIED ABOVEGROUND STORAGE TANKS
Sec. 48. Section 427A.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 6A. Notwithstanding the other provisions
of this section, an aboveground storage tank with a capacity
of ninety-one thousand gallons or less, no matter the use or
intended use on the subject property, shall not be assessed and
taxed as real property.
Sec. 49. IMPLEMENTATION. Section 25B.7 shall not apply to
this division of this Act.
Sec. 50. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being
deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment.
Sec. 51. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this
Act applies retroactively to assessment years beginning on or
after January 1, 2026.
DIVISION X
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-21- da/js 21/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
EXCISE TAX ELIMINATION —— GRAIN HANDLING
Sec. 52. Section 445.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
2. a. The commencement of actions for ad valorem taxes
authorized under this section shall not begin until the
issuance of a tax sale certificate under the requirements of
section 446.19. The commencement of actions for all other
taxes authorized under this section shall not begin until ten
days after the publication of tax sale under the requirements
of section 446.9, subsection 2. This subsection
b. Paragraph “a” does not apply to the collection of ad
valorem taxes under section 445.32, and grain handling taxes
under section 428.35.
Sec. 53. REPEAL. Section 428.35, Code 2026, is repealed.
Sec. 54. IMPLEMENTATION. Section 25B.7 shall not apply to
the property tax exemption enacted in this Act.
Sec. 55. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies
to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027.
DIVISION XI
SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION —— HONEYBEES
Sec. 56. Section 423.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 111. The sales price of honeybees.
DIVISION XII
INCOME TAX EXEMPTIONS
PART A
FARM TENANCIES
Sec. 57. Section 422.7, subsection 14, paragraph e, Code
2026, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in
lieu thereof the following:
e. Net income from a farm tenancy agreement earned,
received, or reported by an entity taxed as a disregarded
entity, partnership for federal tax purposes, an S corporation,
a trust, or estate is eligible for the election and deduction
in this subsection for the portion of net income derived from
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-22- da/js 22/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
a farm tenancy agreement if the eligible individual receives
or is entitled to receive the portion of net income through
distributions from an entity taxed as a disregarded entity,
a partnership, an S corporation, a trust, or an estate, to
the same extent that an eligible individual could subtract
net income received directly from the farm tenant rather than
passing to the eligible individual through an entity taxed
as a disregarded entity, a partnership, an S corporation, a
trust, or an estate. For purposes of this paragraph, net
income accruing to a grantor trust or to a business entity
that is a disregarded entity shall be deemed to have been
distributed to its sole owner to the extent the sole owner of
such disregarded entity or trust has the right to withdraw or
compel distribution of such net income.
Sec. 58. EFFECTIVE DATE. This part of this division of this
Act takes effect January 1, 2027.
Sec. 59. APPLICABILITY. This part of this division of this
Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027.
PART B
VETERINARY PRACTICE
Sec. 60. Section 422.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 46. a. Subtract, to the extent included,
loan repayments received under a program agreement entered into
by a taxpayer who is a loan repayment recipient and the Iowa
college student aid commission pursuant to section 256.226, if
the taxpayer fulfils the obligation to engage in practice of
veterinary medicine according to terms of that section and the
program agreement.
b. The subtraction in paragraph “a” shall not exceed the
following limits:
(1) For any tax year, fifteen thousand dollars.
(2) For the aggregate of all tax years, sixty thousand
dollars.
(3) In any case, the amount of the outstanding eligible
LSB 5552XD (7) 91
-23- da/js 23/36

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
loan.